Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 83. Alaska Energy Authority.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring the Alaska Energy Authority, in consultation with the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation, the Alaska Industrial Development Authority, and the Department of Revenue, to develop a plan for developing infrastructure to deliver more affordable energy to areas of the state that are not expected to have direct access to a North Slope natural gas pipeline; in consultation with the Department of Revenue, to develop a plan for the required infrastructure; and to provide the plan and suggested legislation to the legislature before January 1, 2017, see sec. 75, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska energy authority, see 3 AAC, part 14.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 37, ch. 18, SLA 1993 provides that “[t]he Alaska Energy Authority shall, to the maximum extent feasible, enter into contracts with public utilities and other entities to carry out its duties with respect to the maintenance and operation of power projects owned by the Alaska Energy Authority.”